Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 5. Powers of Attorney.
Sec. 13.26.670.
Validity of modified statutory form power of attorney.

A power of attorney that satisfies the requirements of AS

13.26.645

—

13.26.665

is not prevented from being a statutory form power of attorney by the fact that it also contains additional language that

eliminates from the power of attorney one or more of the powers enumerated in one or more of the subsections of 13.26.665 with respect to a section of the statutory form power of attorney that is not eliminated by the principal;

supplements one or more of the powers enumerated in one or more of the subsections of AS

13.26.665

with respect to a section of the statutory form power of attorney that is not eliminated by the principal by specifically listing additional powers of the agent;

makes an additional provision that is not substantially inconsistent with the other provisions of the statutory form power of attorney; or

relieves an agent of liability for breach of a duty under AS

13.26.610

, except to the extent the provision

relieves the agent of liability for breach of duty committed dishonestly, with an improper motive, or with reckless indifference to the purposes of the power of attorney or the best interest of the principal; or

was inserted as a result of an abuse of a confidential or fiduciary relationship with the principal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 1988; am § 18 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.347; renumbered in 2016 at which time several cross references to other renumbered statutes were conformed.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment adding a new paragraph (4) to this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (4), and made related changes.

Sec. 13.26.675.
When statutory form power of attorney is not affected by
incapacity of principal.

The subsequent incapacity of a principal does not revoke or terminate the authority of an agent who acts under a power of attorney in a writing executed by a principal if the writing contains the words “This power of attorney shall become effective upon the incapacity of the principal,” or contains the words “This power of attorney shall not be affected by the subsequent incapacity of the principal,” or words substantially similar showing the intent of the principal that the authority conferred shall be exercisable notwithstanding the principal’s subsequent incapacity or uncertainty as to whether the principal is dead or alive.

An act done by an agent under a power granted in a power of attorney under AS

13.26.645

—

13.26.665

during a period of incapacity or uncertainty as to whether the principal is dead or alive has the same effect and enures to the benefit of and binds a principal and the principal’s distributees, devisees, legatees, and personal representatives as if there were no incapacity of the principal . If a conservator is later appointed for the principal, during the continuance of the appointment , the agent is accountable to the conservator as well as to the principal. The conservator has the same power to revoke, suspend, or terminate the power of attorney that the principal would have if there was no incapacity of the principal .

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 1988; am § 19 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.350; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.645

—

13.26.665

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.332

— 13.26.344”.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a) and (b), substituted “incapacity” for “disability or incompetence” in five places, substituted “agent” for “attorney-in-fact” in two places; in (b), substituted “there were no incapacity of the principal” for “the principal were competent and not disabled”, substituted “the agent is accountable to the conservator as well as to the principal” for “the attorney-in-fact shall account to the conservator rather than to the principal”; inserted “to revoke, suspend, or terminate the power of attorney that” and “there was no incapacity of”, and deleted “were not disabled or incompetent to revoke, suspend, or terminate the power of attorney”.

Sec. 13.26.680.
Provisions applicable to statutory form power of attorney.

For purposes of AS

13.26.645

—

13.26.665

,

the incapacity of a principal shall be established by affidavit stating that the principal is unable to manage property or business affairs because the principal

has an impairment in the ability to receive and evaluate information or make or communicate decisions even with the use of technological assistance, and this impairment is the result of mental illness, mental deficiency, physical illness, physical disability, advanced age, use of drugs, chronic intoxication, or other similar medical or psychological reason, to such an extent that the principal is unable to manage the principal’s property or affairs; or

is

missing;

detained, including incarcerated in a penal system; or

outside the United States and unable to return; and

if the incapacity is based on (1)(A) of this subsection, two physicians or similarly qualified medical professionals who have personally examined the principal shall sign the affidavit; however, the affidavit may be signed by only one physician or similarly qualified medical professional if only one physician or similarly qualified medical professional is available and the affidavit executed by the person states that only one physician or similarly qualified medical professional is available.

A third party who relies on the reasonable representations of an agent designated under AS

13.26.645

—

13.26.670

as to a matter relating to a power granted by a properly executed statutory form power of attorney does not incur a liability to the principal or the principal’s heirs, assigns, or estate as a result of permitting the agent to exercise the authority granted by the power of attorney.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 50 SLA 2016.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 1988; am §§ 20, 21, 28 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.353; renumbered in 2016 at which time in subsection (a) “AS

13.26.645

—

13.26.665

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.332

— 13.26.344” and in subsection (b) “AS

13.26.645

—

13.26.670

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.332

— 13.26.347”.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to subsections (a) and (b) of this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, rewrote (a); in (b), substituted “agent” for “attorney-in-fact” in two places; substituted “AS

13.26.332

— 13.26.347” for “AS

13.26.332

— 13.26.344”; repealed (c).

Sec. 13.26.695.
Definitions.

In AS

13.26.600

—

13.26.695

,

“benefits from government programs or civil or military service” means a benefit, a program, or assistance provided under a statute or regulation, including social security, Medicare, and Medicaid;

“good faith” means honesty in fact;

“incapacity” means inability of an individual to manage property or business affairs because the individual

has an impairment in the ability to receive and evaluate information or make or communicate decisions even with the use of technological assistance; or

is

missing;

detained, including incarcerated in a penal system; or

outside the United States and unable to return;

“retirement plan” means a plan or account created by an employer, the principal, or another individual to provide retirement benefits or deferred compensation of which the principal is a participant, beneficiary, or owner, including a plan or account under the following sections of 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code):

an individual retirement account under 26 U.S.C. 408 (Internal Revenue Code), as amended;

a Roth IRA under 26 U.S.C. 408A (Internal Revenue Code), as amended;

an individual retirement account under 26 U.S.C. 408(q) (Internal Revenue Code), as amended;

an annuity or custodial account under 26 U.S.C. 403(b) (Internal Revenue Code), as amended;

a pension, profit-sharing, stock bonus, or other retirement plan qualified under 26 U.S.C. 401(a) (Internal Revenue Code), as amended;

a plan under 26 U.S.C. 457(b) (Internal Revenue Code), as amended; and

a nonqualified deferred compensation plan under 26 U.S.C. 409A (Internal Revenue Code), as amended.

History.

(§ 26 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.26.359; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.600

—

13.26.695

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.326 — 13.26.359”.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 enactment of this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effective dates. —

Section 30, ch. 50, SLA 2016 makes this section effective January 1, 2017.